Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.101

Failure of creditor to proceed—Discharge of surety.

If the creditor or obligee shall not proceed within a reasonable time to bring his or her action upon such contract, and prosecute the same to judgment and execution, the surety shall be discharged from all liability thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 548; Code 1881 s 645; RRS s 975. Prior: 1877 p 134 s 648; 1869 p 150 s 585; 1854 p 210 s 427. Formerly RCW 19.72.100, part.]